Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1760
Vacancies.

The board of directors shall fill any vacancies occurring on the board. An individual appointed to fill a vacancy on the board shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term, except that he or she shall cease to serve immediately if he or she replaced a director who was suspended or removed by the board or the supervisory committee and the credit union membership reversed such suspension or removal. Vacancies in the credit or supervisory committees shall be filled as provided in the bylaws.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 60.